Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.070

Pet animals—Taking, concealing, injuring, killing, etc.—Penalty.

(1) Any person who, with intent to deprive or defraud the owner thereof, does any of the following shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW and, for adult offenders, a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars per pet animal shall be imposed, except as provided by subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Takes, leads away, confines, secretes or converts any pet animal, except in cases in which the value of the pet animal exceeds seven hundred fifty dollars;

(b) Conceals the identity of any pet animal or its owner by obscuring, altering, or removing from the pet animal any collar, tag, license, tattoo, or other identifying device or mark;

(c) Willfully or recklessly kills or injures any pet animal, unless excused by law.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person from also being convicted of separate offenses under RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, or 9A.56.050 for theft, under RCW 9A.56.150, 9A.56.160, or 9A.56.170 for possession of stolen property, or under chapter 16.52 RCW for animal cruelty.

[ 2015 c 265 s 10; 2015 c 235 s 5; 2003 c 53 s 9; 1989 c 359 s 2; 1982 c 114 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2015 c 235 s 5 and by 2015 c 265 s 10, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Application of Consumer Protection Act: RCW 19.86.145.